Georgia statutes. 
36-32-8. Jurisdiction in cases of operating motor vehicle without certificate of emission inspection; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases.

36-32-9. Misdemeanor theft by shoplifting or misdemeanor refund fraud; transfer of cases; penalties; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; reports.

36-32-10. Jurisdiction in cases of furnishing alcoholic beverages to and purchase and possession of alcoholic beverages by underage persons; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases; penalties.

36-32-10.1. Jurisdiction in counties without state court to try violations of Code Section 16-7-21; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases; penalties.

36-32-10.2. Trial upon citation, summons, or accusation.

36-32-10.3. Jurisdiction over littering offenses.

36-32-11. Required training for judges.

36-32-12. Municipal court held outside municipality.

36-32-13. Municipal court clerks; role of Municipal Courts Training Council.

Article 2

Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council.

36-32-20. Short title.

36-32-21. Definitions.

36-32-22. Establishment of Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council; membership.

36-32-23. Oath of office.

36-32-24. Election of chairman and vice-chairman; secretary; quorum; minutes; annual report.

36-32-25. Remuneration.

36-32-26. Functions, powers, and responsibilities.

36-32-27. Mandatory training of municipal judges.

Article 3

Council of Municipal Court Judges.

36-32-40. Creation of council; membership and organization; purpose; expenses; contracts; assistance to council; members not ineligible to hold office of judge.

36-32-41. Savings plans and deferred compensation plans for council members.

Annotations

Cross references. - City courts, T. 15, C. 8.

Law reviews. - For article, "The City Court of Atlanta and the 1983 Georgia Constitution: Is the Judicial Engine Souped Up or Blown Up?," see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 941 (1999). For annual survey article, "'Garbage In, Garbage Out': The Litigation Implosion Over the Unconstitutional Organization and Jurisdiction of the City Court of Atlanta," see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 49 (2000).

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-32-1. Establishment of municipal court; punishments; selection, election, or appointment of mayor pro tempore or recorder pro tempore.

Statute text

(a) Each municipal corporation of this state shall, unless otherwise provided in the local law relating to a particular municipal corporation, be authorized to establish and maintain a municipal court having jurisdiction over the violation of municipal ordinances and over such other matters as are by general law made subject to the jurisdiction of municipal courts. Any such court shall be styled as a municipal court. Any reference in this Code or in any local law to a corporate court, police court, recorder's court, mayor's court, or any such court known by any other name which has jurisdiction over the violation of municipal offenses shall be deemed to mean a municipal court. Except in this Code section and in the laws relating to the City Court of Atlanta, the terms "corporate court," "corporate courts," "police court," "police courts," "recorder's court," "recorders' courts," "mayor's court," and "mayors' courts," when such terms refer to a court of a municipal corporation, are stricken wherever they appear in any general or local law of this state and the term "municipal court" or "municipal courts," whichever is appropriate, is inserted in lieu thereof. The change in the name of any such court as provided for by Article VI, Section X, Paragraph I of the Constitution of the State of Georgia and by this Code section shall not affect the validity of any action or prosecution in such court.

(b) The provisions of this chapter shall apply equally to all municipal courts, whether heretofore styled as a municipal court, corporate court, police court, recorder's court, or mayor's court or called by some other name and whether established by the municipal corporation under authority granted to the municipal corporation or established by the local law relating to a particular municipal corporation.

(c) Each municipal court of this state, unless otherwise provided in the local law relating to a particular municipal court, shall be authorized to impose any punishment up to the maximums specified by general law, including the maximums specified in subparagraphs (a)(2)(B) and (a)(2)(C) of Code Section 36-35-6.

(d) The governing bodies of the municipal corporations of this state having a municipal court are authorized and empowered, either by ordinance or resolution, to select, elect, or appoint either a mayor pro tempore or a recorder pro tempore to hold and preside over such municipal court in the absence or disqualification of the mayor or recorder. While presiding in such corporate courts, the mayor pro tempore or recorder pro tempore shall have such power, authority, and jurisdiction as is given by the charter of the municipal corporation to its mayor or recorder.

(e) Subsection (d) of this Code section shall not affect any municipal corporation for which provision is made in the charter for the appointment or selection of a mayor pro tempore or a recorder pro tempore.

(f) Any municipal court operating within this state and having jurisdiction over the violation of municipal ordinances and over such other matters as are by specific or general law made subject to the jurisdiction of municipal courts shall not impose any punishment of confinement, probation, or other loss of liberty, or impose any fine, fee, or cost enforceable by confinement, probation, or other loss of liberty, as authorized by general law or municipal or county ordinance, unless the court provides to the accused the right to representation by a lawyer, and provides to those accused who are indigent the right to counsel at no cost to the accused. Such representation shall be subject to all applicable standards adopted by the Georgia Public Defender Council for representation of indigent persons in this state.

(g) Any municipal court operating within this state that has jurisdiction over the violation of municipal or county ordinances or such other statutes as are by specific or general law made subject to the jurisdiction of municipal courts, and that holds committal hearings in regard to such alleged violations, must provide to the accused the right to representation by a lawyer, and must provide to those accused who are indigent the right to counsel at no cost to the accused. Such representation shall be subject to all applicable standards adopted by the Georgia Public Defender Council for representation of indigent persons in this state.

(h) Any municipality or municipal court may contract with the office of the circuit public defender of the judicial circuit in which such municipality is located as a means of complying with the municipality's or municipal court's legal obligation to provide defense counsel at no cost to indigent persons appearing before the court in relation to violations of municipal ordinances, county ordinances, or state laws.

History

(Ga. L. 1922, p. 133, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 69-702, 69-703; Ga. L. 1986, p. 784, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 2003, p. 191, § 9; Ga. L. 2015, p. 519, § 8-9/HB 328.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Constitutional provisions regarding courts with municipal jurisdiction, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. X, Para. I.

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 105 (2003).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Municipal court not a city court or court of record. - Municipal court established as part of the charter for a city was not a city court and was not a court of record authorized to grant new trials. City of Lawrenceville v. Davis, 233 Ga. App. 1, 502 S.E.2d 794 (1998).

Cited in Felix v. State, 241 Ga. App. 323, 526 S.E.2d 637 (1999); Nguyen v. State, 282 Ga. 483, 651 S.E.2d 681 (2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Member of General Assembly may not serve as municipal court judge. - While the separation of powers doctrine does not apply where the issues relate solely to municipal officials utilizing municipal powers, it does apply where it concerns a municipal court judge exercising state judicial powers. Because of that, the exercise of those state judicial powers by a legislator would be a violation of the constitutional prohibition against a member of one branch exercising the powers of another branch of government. Therefore, a member of the Georgia General Assembly may not serve as a municipal court judge. 2014 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U2014-2.

36-32-1.1. Municipal court judges; qualifications to serve.

Statute text

Municipal court judges shall be licensed to practice law in the State of Georgia and an active member in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia; provided, however, that any judge serving on June 30, 2011, who does not meet the qualifications required by this Code section may serve as municipal court judge in any municipality so long as such judge is in compliance with Code Section 36-32-27. The provisions of this Code section shall expressly supersede any conflicting local law of this state.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-1.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 398, § 1/SB 30.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Member of General Assembly may not serve as municipal court judge. - While the separation of powers doctrine does not apply when the issues relate solely to municipal officials utilizing municipal powers, it does apply when it concerns a municipal court judge exercising state judicial powers. Because of that, the exercise of those state judicial powers by a legislator would be a violation of the constitutional prohibition against a member of one branch exercising the powers of another branch of government. Therefore, a member of the Georgia General Assembly may not serve as a municipal court judge. 2014 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U2014-2.

36-32-2. Appointment of judges.

Statute text

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any general or local Act, the governing authority of each municipal corporation within this state having a municipal court, as provided by the Act incorporating the municipal corporation or any amendments thereto, is authorized to appoint a judge of such court. Any individual appointed as a judge under this Code section shall possess such qualifications as set forth in Code Section 36-32-1.1 and shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed by the governing authority of the municipal corporation. Any individual appointed as a judge under this Code section shall serve for a minimum term of one year and until a successor is appointed or if the judge is removed from office as provided in Code Section 36-32-2.1. Such term shall be memorialized in a written agreement between such individual and the governing authority of the municipal corporation or in an ordinance or a charter. With respect to an individual serving as a municipal court judge in a consolidated government, the local Act shall determine the term of such judge.

(b) This Code section shall not be construed to require the governing authority of any municipal corporation to appoint a judge; but such governing authority may appoint a judge if, acting in its sole discretion, the governing authority determines that such appointment would be in the best interest of the municipal corporation.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-704.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 489, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1995, p. 712, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 367, § 1/HB 691.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, "Code Section 36-32-2.1" was substituted for "Code Section 36-32-2.2" in subsection (a).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Separation of powers. - Because a municipal court is a municipal office discharging strictly municipal functions, O.C.G.A. § 36-32-2(a) does not violate the separation of powers doctrine of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. III and the city was authorized to require the judge to reinstate the contract between the county and the private probation services company. Ward v. City of Cairo, 276 Ga. 391, 583 S.E.2d 821 (2003).

Judge was qualified to preside over case. - Municipal court judge was qualified to preside over the case although the judge was not a resident of the judicial circuit in which the court was located, when neither the mayor nor another member of the governing authority of the city served as a judge of the municipal court. Giles v. City of Locust Grove, 203 Ga. App. 164, 416 S.E.2d 758, cert. denied, 203 Ga. App. 906, 416 S.E.2d 758 (1992).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Clerk of Superior Court may not serve as Judge of Mayor's Court. - Clerk of the Superior Court is prohibited by a common-law conflict of interest from simultaneously serving as the Judge of the Mayor's Court. 1984 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U84-22.

Member of General Assembly may not serve as municipal court judge. - While the separation of powers doctrine does not apply where the issues relate solely to municipal officials utilizing municipal powers, it does apply where it concerns a municipal court judge exercising state judicial powers. Because of that, the exercise of those state judicial powers by a legislator would be a violation of the constitutional prohibition against a member of one branch exercising the powers of another branch of government. Therefore, a member of the Georgia General Assembly may not serve as a municipal court judge. 2014 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U2014-2.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 46 Am. Jur. 2d, Judges, §§ 5, 7. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 205, 209.

C.J.S. - 16 C.J.S., Constitutional Law, § 366 et seq. 48A C.J.S., Judges, § 23 et seq. 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 407, 418 et seq., 447, 448, 455.

36-32-2.1. Removal of judges.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "judge" means an individual serving as an appointed municipal court judge.

(b) (1) A judge may be removed during his or her term of office by a two-thirds' vote of the entire membership of the governing authority of the municipal corporation for:

(A) Willful misconduct in office;

(B) Willful and persistent failure to perform duties;

(C) Habitual intemperance;

(D) Conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice which brings the judicial office into disrepute; or

(E) Disability seriously interfering with the performance of duties, which is, or is likely to become, of a permanent character.

(2) A municipality may define in its charter further conduct that may lead to a judge's removal.

(c) Removal proceedings pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section may be initiated only by written petition setting forth the grounds for removal of a judge signed by one or more members of the governing authority of the municipal corporation. Upon submission of the petition to remove the judge to such governing authority, the governing authority may consider the petition and determine if the petition relates to and adversely affects the administration of the office of the judge and the rights and interests of the public. If it is determined at a public meeting by a majority vote of the governing authority of the municipal corporation that there is an adverse impact, the judge may be suspended immediately and without further action for up to 60 days pending the final determination pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section. A judge suspended pursuant to this subsection shall continue to receive the compensation from his or her office until the final determination on the petition or expiration of the suspension.

(d) If by the expiration of the suspension period no formal resolution of the petition has been made, the judge shall be reinstated.

(e) Removal proceedings shall consist of an open and public hearing held by the governing authority of the municipal corporation, provided that the judge against whom such charges have been brought shall be furnished a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to the hearing. At the conclusion of the hearing, the governing authority of the municipal corporation shall determine whether or not to remove the judge from office. The governing authority of the municipal corporation may adopt rules governing the procedures at such hearings, provided that such hearings comport with due process. The right of certiorari from the decision to remove a judge from office shall exist, and such certiorari shall be obtained under the sanction of a judge of the superior court of the circuit in which the governing authority of the municipal corporation is situated.

(f) This Code section shall not affect the power and authority of the Judicial Qualifications Commission to discipline, remove, or cause the involuntary retirement of judges.

(g) Any vacancy in a judgeship created by the removal of a judge pursuant to this Code section may be temporarily filled by the governing authority of the municipal corporation for a period not longer than 90 days by any individual qualified by law to serve as a municipal court judge. If after the conclusion of the removal proceedings, including the appeal period, there is a vacancy for such judgeship, the governing authority of the municipal corporation may appoint a judge in the same manner as set forth in Code Section 36-32-2.

(h) The provisions of this Code section shall expressly supersede any conflicting local law of this state; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply to a local Act creating a municipal court for a consolidated government.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-2.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 367, § 2/HB 691.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, Code Section 36-32-2.2, as enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 367, § 2/HB 691, was redesignated as Code Section 36-32-2.1.

36-32-3. Powers of judges.

Statute text

All judges of all municipal courts in this state shall have and are given the same powers and authorities as magistrates in the matter of and pertaining to criminal cases of whatever nature in the several courts of this state.

History

(Ga. L. 1935, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-26; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions under former Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 176, are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Officers ex officio justice. - Recorder is ex officio a justice of the peace (now magistrate) for the purpose of committing the defendant for state offenses disclosed in investigations made in the police court. Smith v. City of Atlanta, 5 Ga. App. 492, 63 S.E. 569 (1909) (decided under Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 176).

Cited in Savannah News-Press, Inc. v. Harley, 100 Ga. App. 387, 111 S.E.2d 259 (1959); Hall v. State, 113 Ga. App. 587, 149 S.E.2d 175 (1966); Pass v. State, 227 Ga. 730, 182 S.E.2d 779 (1971); Richards v. State, 131 Ga. App. 362, 206 S.E.2d 93 (1974); Branch v. State, 248 Ga. 300, 282 S.E.2d 894 (1981); Focus Entm't Int'l, Inc. v. Bailey, 256 Ga. App. 283, 568 S.E.2d 183 (2002).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Mayor of a city has no right to try a case involving a state offense, when the defendant is caught within the city limits, in a county which has a superior court but does not have a city court. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 216.

Power to issue arrest warrants. - Under former Code 1933, § 27-102 (see now O.C.G.A. § 17-4-40), the power of ex officio justices of the peace (now magistrates) includes the authority to issue warrants for the arrest of offenders against the penal laws of this state. 1960-61 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 96.

36-32-4. Authority of municipal corporations to provide for forfeiture of appearance bonds.

Statute text

Any municipal corporation shall have full power and authority to provide, by ordinance, for the forfeiture of bonds given by offenders for their appearance before municipal courts and to provide for the collection of the same from the principal and sureties on such bonds by judgment, execution, and sale.

History

(Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 176, § 1; Code 1933, § 69-206.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

For note, "Bail in Georgia: Elimination of 'Double Bonding': A Partially Solved Problem," see 8 Ga. St. B. J. 220 (1971).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Liability of surety on criminal appearance bond. - City ordinance which seeks to hold the surety liable on a criminal appearance bond until the fine imposed is collected does not conflict with Georgia case law; is authorized by O.C.G.A. § 36-32-4, which authorizes municipal corporations to make provision by ordinance as to what constitutes the forfeiture of bonds given by offenders for their appearance before municipal courts; and does not conflict with O.C.G.A. § 17-6-31 (surrender on surety bonds); for these reasons, there has not been preemption by the state in this area of regulatory activity. Therefore, the ordinance is not unconstitutional under the special law - general law prohibition contained in Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV. City of Macon v. Davis, 251 Ga. 332, 305 S.E.2d 116 (1983).

36-32-5. Sentences and fines which may be imposed.

Statute text

All municipal courts having authority to try offenses against the laws of the municipal corporations in which such courts are located shall have the power and authority:

(1) To impose fines upon persons convicted of such offenses, with the alternative of other punishment allowed by law, in the event that such fines are not paid;

(2) To sentence such person to community service work; or

(3) To impose a sentence consisting of any combination of the penalties provided for in this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 153, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 712; Civil Code 1910, § 857; Code 1933, § 69-704; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1391, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Mayor authorized to impose sentence consisting of fine, or in case of default, labor upon public streets. Leonard v. Mayor of Eatonton, 126 Ga. 63, 54 S.E. 963 (1906).

For contrary view, holding that mayor had no power in absence of express legislative authority to impose a sentence of labor, see Brieswick v. Brunswick, 51 Ga. 639 (1874); Carr v. City of Conyers, 84 Ga. 287, 10 S.E. 630 (1890); Williams v. Sewell, 121 Ga. 665, 49 S.E. 732 (1905).

Sentencing authority of recorder courts. - Enactment of O.C.G.A. § 36-32-5 did not evince a legislative intent to limit the authority of a recorder's court to the imposition of an alternative sentence consisting of either a fine or other punishment; the intent was merely to broaden the authority of a recorder's court so as to permit the imposition of such an alternative sentence in addition to the fine. City of LaGrange v. Hatfield, 175 Ga. App. 697, 334 S.E.2d 25 (1985) (construing section as it existed prior to 1985 amendment).

Ordinances construed together. - When three ordinances of a city provide, among other things, that the judge of the municipal court may impose, under certain circumstances, a fine or confinement in the station house, or both, and upon the refusal of the defendant to pay the fine, the court may by order require the person so refusing to work on the streets or some public works, such ordinances, relative to the enforcement thereof by the imposition of a fine are to be construed together. Lyons v. Collier, 125 Ga. 231, 54 S.E. 183 (1906); Jones v. Lanford, 141 Ga. 646, 81 S.E. 885 (1914).

When one sentence is unauthorized. - Sentence imposing two penalties in the alternative, one of which is unauthorized, is not void, but may be enforced as to the penalty which is authorized. Brown v. City of Atlanta, 123 Ga. 497, 51 S.E. 507 (1905).

Alternative provisions. - When, under the charter and ordinances of a city, the mayor has authority to punish one convicted of violating the municipal ordinances by imprisonment or compulsory labor on public works, or by fine, a sentence directing "confinement on the streets" is not rendered unlawful merely because an alternative provision is added by which the defendant may be discharged at any time upon the payment of a fine. Shuler v. Willis, 126 Ga. 73, 54 S.E. 965 (1906).

Sentence held to be alternative. - When, upon the trial of one charged with the violation of a municipal ordinance, the court, on conviction of the accused, rendered judgment that the defendant pay a fine of $25.00 dollars, or, in default thereof, that the defendant be imprisoned in the calaboose 30 days, such judgment imposed an alternative sentence. Leonard v. Mayor of Eatonton, 126 Ga. 63, 54 S.E. 963 (1906); Hardy v. Mayor of Eatonton, 128 Ga. 27, 57 S.E. 99 (1907).

Review after execution. - Defendant who has paid a fine imposed by a police court, with the alternative of imprisonment, cannot, after paying such fine, prosecute a writ of error to review the judgment unless the fine was paid under protest and under duress. Brown v. City of Atlanta, 123 Ga. 497, 51 S.E. 507 (1905); White v. City of Tifton, 1 Ga. App. 569, 57 S.E. 1038 (1907); Kitchens v. State, 4 Ga. App. 440, 61 S.E. 736 (1908).

Cited in Maner v. Dykes, 183 Ga. 118, 187 S.E. 699 (1936); City of Albany v. Key, 124 Ga. App. 16, 183 S.E.2d 20 (1971).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 21 Am. Jur. 2d, Courts, § 44.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 323 et seq.

ALR. - Delegating authority to county or municipal corporation to make violation of ordinance crime or to provide criminal punishment, 174 A.L.R. 1343.

36-32-6. Jurisdiction in marijuana possession cases; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases.

Statute text

(a) The municipal court of any municipality is granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of cases where a person is charged with the possession of one ounce or less of marijuana if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of such municipality. The jurisdiction of any such court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other courts within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any fines and bond forfeitures arising from the prosecution of such cases shall be retained by the municipality and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipality.

(c) Any defendant charged with possession of an ounce or less of marijuana in a municipal court shall be entitled on request to have the case against him or her transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county wherein the alleged offense occurred.

(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to give any municipality the right to impose a fine or punish by imprisonment in excess of the limits as set forth in the municipality's charter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 825, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1377, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Purchase, possession, manufacture, distribution, or sale of controlled substances or marijuana, § 16-13-30.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1997, p. 1377, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "it is the intent of the General Assembly to restore the law of this state to that which was generally understood to be the law prior to the decision of the Court of Appeals in Williams v. State, 222 Ga. App. 698, Case No. A96A1472, decided August 20, 1996, such that possession of one ounce or less of marijuana is a misdemeanor and the provisions of Code Section 36-32-6 are applicable to such offenses."

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-32-6.1. Jurisdiction in cases involving transactions in drug objects; disposition of fines; transfer of cases.

Statute text

(a) The municipal court of any municipality shall be granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of cases where a person is charged with transactions in drug related objects in violation of Code Section 16-13-32 if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of such municipality. The jurisdiction of any such court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other courts within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any fines arising from the prosecution of such cases shall be retained by the municipality and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipality.

(c) Any defendant charged with transactions in drug related objects in violation of Code Section 16-13-32 in a municipal court shall be entitled, upon request, to have the case against him or her transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county where the alleged offense occurred.

(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to give any municipality the right to impose a fine or punish by imprisonment in excess of the limits as set forth in the municipality's charter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-6.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 53, § 5/SB 352.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Prosecuting attorneys of municipal courts, § 15-18-90 et seq.

36-32-7. Jurisdiction in cases of operating motor vehicle without effective insurance; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases.

Statute text

(a) The municipal court of each municipality is granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of cases where a person is charged with a misdemeanor under Code Section 40-6-10 of knowingly operating or knowingly authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle without effective insurance of such vehicle or without an approved plan of self-insurance as required by Chapter 34 of Title 33, the "Georgia Motor Vehicle Accident Reparations Act," if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of such municipality. The jurisdiction of each such court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other courts within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any fines and bond forfeitures arising from the prosecution of such cases shall be retained by the municipality and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipality.

(c) Any defendant charged with a misdemeanor under Code Section 40-6-10 in a municipal court shall be entitled on request to have the case against him transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county in which the alleged offense occurred.

(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to give any municipality the right to impose a fine or punish by imprisonment in excess of the limits as set forth in the municipality's charter.

History

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 113, § 14; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1369, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-32-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 891, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - The provisions of this Code section previously appeared in substantially similar form in subsections (b) through (d) of Code Section 33-34-12, which subsections were deleted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 891, § 1.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-32-8. Jurisdiction in cases of operating motor vehicle without certificate of emission inspection; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases.

Statute text

(a) The municipal court of each municipality of each county required to comply with Article 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 12, known as the "Georgia Motor Vehicle Emission Inspection and Maintenance Act," is granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases in which a person is charged with a misdemeanor under Code Section 12-9-55 of operating a responsible motor vehicle without a certificate of emission inspection, if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of such municipality. The jurisdiction of such court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other courts within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any fines and bond forfeitures arising from the prosecution of such cases shall be retained by the municipality and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipality.

(c) Any defendant charged with a misdemeanor under Code Section 12-9-55 in a municipal court shall be entitled upon request to have the case against him transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county in which the alleged offense occurred.

(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to give any municipality the right to impose a fine in excess of the limits set forth in Code Section 12-9-55.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1390, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-32-9. Misdemeanor theft by shoplifting or misdemeanor refund fraud; transfer of cases; penalties; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; reports.

Statute text

(a) The municipal court is granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of cases in which a person is charged with a misdemeanor theft by shoplifting or misdemeanor refund fraud if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of the municipality. The jurisdiction of such court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other courts within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any person charged in a municipal court with misdemeanor theft by shoplifting or misdemeanor refund fraud shall be entitled upon request to have the case against him or her transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county in which the alleged offense occurred.

(c) (1) A person convicted in a municipal court of misdemeanor theft by shoplifting shall be punished as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 16-8-14, provided that nothing in this Code section or Code Section 16-8-14 shall be construed to give any municipality the right to impose a fine or punishment by imprisonment in excess of the limits as set forth in the municipality's charter.

(2) A person convicted in a municipal court of misdemeanor refund fraud shall be punished as provided in the misdemeanor penalties set forth in Code Section 16-8-14.1, provided that nothing in this Code section or Code Section 16-8-14.1 shall be construed to give any municipality the right to impose a fine or punishment by imprisonment in excess of the limits as set forth in the municipality's charter.

(d) Any fines and bond forfeitures arising from the prosecution of such cases in such municipal court shall be retained by the municipality and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipality.

(e) It shall be the duty of the appropriate agencies of the municipality in which an offense under subsection (a) of this Code section is charged to make any reports to the Georgia Crime Information Center required under Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1153, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 188, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 831, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 8-14/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2014, p. 404, § 2-3/SB 382; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, Code Section 36-32-9, as enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1462, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 36-32-10.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act."

Ga. L. 2014, p. 404, § 3-1/SB 382, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, and shall apply to all conduct occurring on or after such date."

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012). For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Theft by shoplifting as fingerprintable offense. - O.C.G.A. § 36-23-9 does not require any modification in the designation of theft by shoplifting as an offense for which persons charged with a violation are to be fingerprinted. 1987 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 87-21.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity, construction, and effect of statutes establishing shoplifting or its equivalent as separate criminal offense, 64 A.L.R.4th 1088.

36-32-10. Jurisdiction in cases of furnishing alcoholic beverages to and purchase and possession of alcoholic beverages by underage persons; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases; penalties.

Statute text

(a) The municipal courts are granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of a first offense violation of Code Section 3-3-23, relating to furnishing alcoholic beverages to, and purchase and possession of alcoholic beverages by, a person under 21 years of age, if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of such municipal corporation. The jurisdiction of such municipal court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other courts within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any fines and bond forfeitures arising from the prosecution of such cases shall be retained by the municipal corporation and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipal corporation.

(c) Any defendant charged with a first offense violation of Code Section 3-3-23 in a municipal court shall be entitled upon request to have the case against him transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county in which the alleged offense occurred.